District of Columbia statutes.
48-902.13

Revising and republishing of schedules.

The Mayor shall revise and republish the schedules semiannually for 2 years from August 5, 1981, and thereafter annually. The published schedules may include the brand or trade names of the substances controlled.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 213, 28 DCR 3081
1981 Ed., § 33-523.
This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.
Effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02.